New York, session 2025-2026, A8912.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 804 of the education law, as amended by chapter 390 2 of the laws of 2016 and subdivision 1 as amended by chapter 1 of the 3 laws of 2017, is amended to read as follows: 4 § 804. Health education regarding mental health, alcohol, drugs, 5 tobacco abuse, gambling and the prevention and detection of certain 6 cancers. 1. All schools shall ensure that their health education 7 programs recognize the multiple dimensions of health by including mental 8 health and the relation of physical and mental health so as to enhance 9 student understanding, attitudes and behaviors that promote health, 10 well-being and human dignity. 11 2. All schools shall include, as an integral part of health education, 12 instruction so as to discourage the misuse and abuse of alcohol, 13 tobacco, gambling and other drugs and promote attitudes and behavior 14 that enhance health, well being, and human dignity. 15 3. Instruction regarding alcohol, tobacco, gambling and other drugs 16 shall be included in the health education provided for all elementary 17 school pupils and shall be taught by the regular classroom teachers or 18 by teachers certified to teach health education. Such instruction shall 19 be designed according to the needs and abilities of the pupils at 20 successive grade levels with the purpose of developing desirable health 21 behavior, attitudes, and knowledge as well as self-reliance and problem 22 solving capacity. 23 4. Instruction regarding alcohol, tobacco, gambling and other drugs, 24 in addition to continued health guidance in the junior high school 25 grades and the senior high schools, shall be an integral part of a EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13398-01-5 A. 8912 2 1 required health education course at each of these levels in the second- 2 ary schools curriculum. Students shall be required to demonstrate know- 3 ledge in the subject area through the use of a test, graded project or 4 report, or any other means prescribed by the school authorities regard- 5 ing alcohol, drugs, gambling and tobacco. Any such course shall be 6 taught by teachers holding a certificate to teach health. Related cours- 7 es in the secondary school curriculum shall be taught in a manner 8 supportive of health education regarding alcohol, tobacco, gambling and 9 other drugs. In addition, instruction regarding the dangers of driving 10 while under the influence of alcohol or drugs shall be an integral part 11 of a required health education course in the senior high schools. Such 12 instruction shall be provided in all senior high schools whether or not 13 these schools also provide driver education courses. 14 5. Instruction regarding methods of prevention and detection of 15 certain cancers, including but not limited to breast cancer, skin 16 cancer, testicular cancer and other cancers where certain preventive 17 measures have become generally accepted and certain detection methods 18 have been adopted and recommended generally to the public. Such instruc- 19 tion shall be an integral part of a required health education course at 20 the senior high school level, in addition to continued health guidance 21 in senior high schools. Any such course shall be taught by teachers 22 holding a certificate to teach health. 23 6. a. The commissioner may prescribe in regulations such health educa- 24 tion courses which include instruction regarding alcohol, tobacco, 25 gambling and other drugs as the commissioner may deem necessary and 26 desirable for the welfare of pupils and the community. The contents may 27 be varied to meet the needs of particular school districts, or portions 28 thereof, and need not be uniform throughout the state, provided, howev- 29 er, that school districts shall utilize either the curriculum for health 30 education instruction regarding alcohol, tobacco, gambling and other 31 drugs prescribed by the commissioner or a course approved by the commis- 32 sioner in accordance with criteria established by the commissioner. The 33 commissioner is authorized to make recommendations to the board of 34 regents beginning December first, two thousand fourteen and every three 35 years thereafter relating to the modernization of such instruction 36 required pursuant to subdivision one of this section, to include the 37 most up to date age appropriate information available regarding the 38 misuse and abuse of alcohol, tobacco, gambling and other drugs, includ- 39 ing but not limited to heroin and opioids. Such instruction shall 40 include, but not be limited to, information regarding drugs and other 41 substances that are more prevalent among school aged youth. Such recom- 42 mendations shall be the result of a collaboration between the depart- 43 ment, the office of alcoholism and substance abuse services and the 44 department of health. If the board of regents adopts such curriculum, 45 the curriculum requirement shall take effect no later than the next 46 school year after such curriculum has been adopted. 47 b. The commissioner shall make available an interpersonal violence 48 prevention education package for grades kindergarten through twelve, 49 which package may consist of student pamphlets, parent pamphlets, vide- 50 otapes and other informative materials to be distributed to school 51 districts, and shall encourage the use of such material as part of the 52 health or other related curricula or programs. 53 c. The regents shall review the health curriculum requirements in 54 existence on the effective date of [this paragraph] chapter one hundred 55 eighty-one of the laws of two thousand for the purpose of streamlining 56 such curriculum and identifying any outdated components that may be A. 8912 3 1 eliminated or consolidated in order to ensure that students have suffi- 2 cient time and instruction to develop skills to address issues of 3 violence prevention and mental health. To the extent appropriate, the 4 regents shall modify the existing curriculum to provide greater focus on 5 the development of skills, by no later than middle school, that are 6 needed to recognize, cope with and address potentially violent incidents 7 including an understanding of student roles in emergency situations and 8 other related skills designed to reduce the threat of violence in 9 schools. 10 7. School authorities shall provide the needed facilities, time, and 11 place for the instruction set forth herein and shall provide learning 12 aids and curriculum resource materials which contribute to effective 13 teaching methods and learning in health education regarding alcohol, 14 tobacco, gambling and other drugs. 15 8. All pre-service training programs in the state for elementary 16 teachers shall include adequate preparation regarding the instruction in 17 alcohol, tobacco, gambling and other drugs set forth herein, and no 18 teacher shall be licensed except upon satisfactory demonstration of the 19 competencies included in the institutional proposals approved by the 20 department. 21 9. Nothing contained in this section shall be deemed to diminish or 22 impair the duties of the commissioner with respect to the continuing 23 program for critical health problems established by chapter seven 24 hundred eighty-seven of the laws of nineteen hundred sixty-seven as 25 amended. The commissioner shall coordinate actions taken under authority 26 of this section with the provisions of said chapter as they relate to 27 health education in schools, inservice training and training programs, 28 and curriculum or syllabus development regarding the deleterious effects 29 resulting from the use, misuse, and abuse of alcohol, tobacco, gambling 30 and other drugs. 31 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.